Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB243.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1674YC (2) 91 sc/js H.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 35A.23 Veterans service 1 organization grant program. 2 1. A veterans service organization grant program is 3 established under the administration and control of the 4 department to award grants to veterans service organizations 5 for the purpose of ensuring adequate staff are employed to 6 assist veterans with claims. 7 2. A veterans service organization grant fund is created 8 within the state treasury under the control of the department. 9 The fund shall consist of moneys appropriated to the fund by 10 the general assembly and any other moneys available to and 11 obtained or accepted by the department for deposit in the fund. 12 All moneys in the fund are appropriated to the department for 13 purposes of administering the program and providing grants 14 under the program. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys in 15 the fund that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close 16 of a fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available 17 for expenditure for the purposes designated. Notwithstanding 18 section 12C.7, subsection 2, interest or earnings on moneys in 19 the fund shall be credited to the fund. 20 3. a. In administering the program, the department shall 21 award matching funds to veterans service organizations for the 22 purpose of employing staff to assist veterans with claims. 23 b. To receive a grant, a veterans service organization shall 24 demonstrate that moneys have been budgeted and will be expended 25 by the veterans service organization in the amount required to 26 provide matching funds for each staff position for which grant 27 moneys are sought. 28 c. For purposes of this section, âveterans service 29 organizationâ means an organization recognized pursuant to 38 30 C.F.R. Â§14.628(c). 31 4. The department shall adopt, as necessary, application 32 procedures, forms, administrative guidelines, and other rules 33 pursuant to chapter 17A for purposes of implementing and 34 administering the program. 35 -1- LSB 1674YC (2) 91 sc/js 1/ 2 H.F. _____ Sec. 2. VETERANS SERVICE ORGANIZATION GRANT FUND ââ 1 APPROPRIATION. There is appropriated from the general fund of 2 the state to the department of veterans affairs for the fiscal 3 year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the 4 following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 5 used for the purposes designated: 6 For deposit in the veterans service organization grant fund 7 created in section 35A.23, as enacted by this Act: 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 250,000 9